Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.220

Rights of clients.

The client of an auctioneer or auction company has a right to (1) an accounting for any money that the auctioneer or auction company receives from the sale of the client's goods, (2) payment of all money due to the client within twenty-one calendar days unless the parties have mutually agreed in writing to another time of payment, and (3) bring an action against the surety bond or other security filed in lieu of the surety bond for any violation of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1987 c 336 s 3; 1986 c 324 s 20.]